Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.140

Record of parolees—Privacy—Release of sex offender information—Immunity from liability—Cooperation by officials and employees.

(1) The board shall cause a complete record to be kept of every prisoner under the jurisdiction of the board released on parole or community custody. Such records shall be organized in accordance with the most modern methods of filing and indexing so that there will be always immediately available complete information about each such prisoner. Subject to information sharing provisions related to offenders with mental illness and the end of sentence review committee, the board may make rules as to the privacy of such records and their use by others than the board and the department staff assigned to perform board-related duties. Sex offenders convicted of crimes committed before July 1, 1984, who are under the board's jurisdiction shall be subject to the determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk level and subject to sex offender registration and community notification. The board and the department staff assigned to perform board-related duties shall be immune from liability for the release of information concerning sex offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

The superintendents of state correctional facilities and all officers and employees thereof and all other public officials shall at all times cooperate with the board and furnish to the board and staff assigned to perform board-related duties such information as may be necessary to enable it to perform its functions, and such superintendents and other employees shall at all times give the members of the board and staff assigned to perform board-related duties free access to all prisoners confined in the state correctional facilities.

(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 shall be subject to the determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk level and subject to sex offender registration and community notification.

(3) The end of sentence review committee shall make law enforcement notifications for offenders under board jurisdiction on the same basis that it notifies law enforcement regarding offenders sentenced under chapter 9.94A RCW for crimes committed after July 1, 1984.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 19; 2009 c 28 s 29; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 341; 1992 c 7 s 27; 1990 c 3 s 126; 1955 c 133 s 15. Prior: 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section: RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.765.